Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-240
Tax; deficiency; interest; penalty.

All deficiencies of the tax prescribed in subsection (1) of section 9-239 shall accrue interest and be subject to a penalty as provided for sales and use taxes in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 71;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-197;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 41.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.